Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 276A.340 is amended to read:
276A.340. As used in ORS 276A.340 to 276A.344:
(1) “Artificial intelligence” means a machine-based system that  is capable, for a given set
of human-defined objectives, of  making predictions, recommendations or decisions influenc-
ing real or virtual environments and uses machine- or human-based inputs to:
(a) Perceive real or virtual environments;
(b) Abstract the perceptions into models through analysis in an automated manner; and
(c) Use model inference to formulate options for information or action.
[(1)] (2) “Covered product” means :
(a) Any form of hardware, software or service provided by a covered vendor.
(b) Any hardware, software or service that uses artificial intelligence  and the artificial
intelligence is developed or owned by a covered vendor.
[(2)] (3) “Covered vendor” means  any of the following corporate entities, or any parent, subsid-
iary, affiliate or successor entity of the following corporate entities:
(a) Ant Group Co., Limited.
(b) ByteDance Limited.
(c) Huawei Technologies Company Limited.
(d) Kaspersky Lab.
(e) Tencent Holdings Limited.
(f) ZTE Corporation.
(g) Any  other corporate entity designated a covered vendor by the State Chief Information Of-
ficer under ORS 276A.344.
[(3)] (4) “State agency” means any board, commission, department, division, office or other entity
of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, except that state government does not  include the
Secretary of State or State Treasurer.
[(4)] (5) “State information  technology asset” means any form of hardware, software or service
for data processing, office automation  or telecommunications used directly by a state agency or used
to a significant extent by a contractor in the performance of a contract with a state agency.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 276A.344 is amended to read:
276A.344. (1) The State Chief Information Officer shall adopt:
(a) Rules pertaining to the designation of a corporate entity as a  covered vendor under ORS
276A.340 [(2)(g)] (3)(g); and
Enrolled House Bill 3936 (HB 3936-A) Page 1
(b) Policies and standards for state agencies to implement the provisions of ORS 276A.342.
(2) The rules adopted under this section must include:
(a) The definition of “national security threat”  for purposes of protecting state information
technology assets;
(b) Criteria and a process for determining when a corporate entity poses  a national security
threat; and
(c) Criteria and a process for determining when a  corporate entity no longer poses a national
security  threat.
(3) The policies and standards adopted under this section must include:
(a) The procedures for providing state agencies, the Secretary of State and the State Treasurer
notice that a  corporate entity is designated or no longer designated a covered vendor under ORS
276A.340 [(2)(g)] (3)(g);
(b) The time schedules for implementing the requirements under ORS  276A.342 with regard to
a corporate entity that is designated a covered vendor by the State Chief Information Officer; and
(c) The time  schedules for incorporating the requirements under ORS 276A.342 into a state
agency’s information security plans, standards or measures.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 276A.346 is amended to read:
276A.346. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Artificial intelligence” means  a machine-based system that is capable, for a given
set of human-defined objectives, of  making predictions, recommendations or decisions influ-
encing real or virtual environments and uses machine- or human-based inputs to:
(A) Perceive real or virtual environments;
(B) Abstract the perceptions into models through analysis in an automated manner; and
(C) Use model inference to formulate options for information or action.
[(a)] (b) “Covered product” means :
(A) Any form of hardware, software or service provided by a covered vendor.
(B) Any hardware, software or service that uses artificial intelligence  and the artificial
intelligence is developed or owned by a covered vendor.
[(b)] (c) “Covered vendor” means any of the following corporate entities, or any  parent, subsid-
iary, affiliate or successor entity of the following corporate entities:
(A) Ant Group Co., Limited.
(B) ByteDance Limited.
(C) Huawei Technologies Company Limited.
(D) Kaspersky Lab.
(E) Tencent Holdings Limited.
(F) ZTE Corporation.
[(c)] (d) “State information technology asset” means any form of hardware,  software or service
for data processing, office automation or telecommunications used directly by  the office of the Sec-
retary of State or used to a significant extent by a contractor in the performance of a  contract with
the office of the Secretary of State.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the Secretary of State shall:
(a) Prohibit a covered product from being:
(A) Installed or downloaded onto a state information technology asset; or
(B) Used or accessed by a state information technology asset;
(b) Remove any covered product that is installed or downloaded onto a state information  tech-
nology asset; and
(c) Implement all measures necessary to prevent the:
(A) Installation or download of a covered product onto a state information technology asset; or
(B) Use or access of a covered product by a state information technology asset.
(3) For any corporate entity that the State  Chief Information Officer designates as a covered
vendor under ORS 276A.344, the secretary may:
(a) Prohibit a covered product from being:
Enrolled House Bill 3936 (HB 3936-A) Page 2
(A) Installed or downloaded onto a state information technology asset; or
(B) Used or accessed by a state information technology asset;
(b) Remove any covered product that is installed or downloaded onto a state information  tech-
nology asset; and
(c) Implement all measures necessary to prevent the:
(A) Installation or download of a covered product onto a state information technology asset; or
(B) Use or access of a covered product by a state information technology asset.
(4) If the  secretary adopts risk mitigation standards and procedures related to the installation,
download, use or access of  a covered product, the secretary may, for investigatory, regulatory or
law enforcement purposes, permit the:
(a) Installation or download of  the covered product onto a state information technology asset;
or
(b) Use or access of the covered product by a state information technology asset.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 276A.348 is amended to read:
276A.348. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Artificial intelligence” means  a machine-based system that is capable, for a given
set of human-defined objectives, of  making predictions, recommendations or decisions influ-
encing real or virtual environments and uses machine- or human-based inputs to:
(A) Perceive real or virtual environments;
(B) Abstract the perceptions into models through analysis in an automated manner; and
(C) Use model inference to formulate options for information or action.
[(a)] (b) “Covered product” means :
(A) Any form of hardware, software or service provided by a covered vendor.
(B) Any hardware, software or service that uses artificial intelligence  and the artificial
intelligence is developed or owned by a covered vendor.
[(b)] (c) “Covered vendor” means any of the following corporate entities, or any  parent, subsid-
iary, affiliate or successor entity of the following corporate entities:
(A) Ant Group Co., Limited.
(B) ByteDance Limited.
(C) Huawei Technologies Company Limited.
(D) Kaspersky Lab.
(E) Tencent Holdings Limited.
(F) ZTE Corporation.
[(c)] (d) “State information technology asset” means any form of hardware,  software or service
for data processing,  office automation or telecommunications used directly by the office of the State
Treasurer or used to a significant extent by a contractor in the performance  of a contract with the
office of the State Treasurer.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the State Treasurer shall:
(a) Prohibit a covered product from being:
(A) Installed or downloaded onto a state information technology asset; or
(B) Used or accessed by a state information technology asset;
(b) Remove  any covered product that is installed or downloaded onto a state information tech-
nology asset; and
(c) Implement all measures necessary to prevent the:
(A) Installation or download of a covered product onto a state information technology asset; or
(B) Use or access of a covered product by a state information technology asset.
(3) For any corporate entity that the State  Chief Information Officer designates as a covered
vendor under ORS 276A.344, the State Treasurer may:
(a) Prohibit a covered product from being:
(A) Installed or downloaded onto a state information technology asset; or
(B) Used or accessed by a state information technology asset;
Enrolled House Bill 3936 (HB 3936-A) Page 3
(b) Remove  any covered product that is installed or downloaded onto a state information tech-
nology asset; and
(c) Implement all measures necessary to prevent the:
(A) Installation or download of a covered product onto a state information technology asset; or
(B) Use or access of a covered product by a state information technology asset.
(4) If the State Treasurer adopts risk mitigation standards and procedures  related to the in-
stallation,  download,  use or access of a covered product, the State Treasurer may, for investigatory,
regulatory or law enforcement purposes, permit the:
(a) Installation or download of  the covered product onto a state information technology asset;
or
(b) Use or access of the covered product by a state information technology asset.
Passed by House May 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3936 (HB 3936-A) Page 4